Utah statutes.
4-35-8.   Persons and activities exempt from civil liability.

No state agency or its officers and employees nor the officers, agents, employees, or representatives of any governmental or private entity acting under the authority granted by this chapter is liable for claims arising out of the reasonable exercise or performance of duties and responsibilities under this chapter.

